Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7628.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18 of the General Laws entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance
Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18-96. Access to pain management services.
(a) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
prescription coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state
on or after January 1, 2027, shall develop a plan to provide adequate coverage of and access to a
broad spectrum of pain management services including, but not limited to, nonopioid, nonnarcotic
medication for pain management and nonmedication pain management services that serve as
alternatives to the prescribing of opioid or narcotic drugs in accordance with guidelines developed
by the bureau.
(b) Approval by health insurance commissioner. Every individual or group health
insurance carrier shall file a plan required under subsection (a) of this section with the
commissioner for approval. In its review, the commissioner shall consider the adequacy of access
to a broad spectrum of pain management services under the plan and whether any policies adopted
by the carrier may create unduly preferential coverage of and access to prescribed opioids for pain
management without consideration of other pain management services.
(c) Information for enrollees. Every individual or group health insurance carrier shall
distribute educational materials to network providers about a pain management access plan under

subsection (a) of this section and post information about the pain management access plan on the
carrier's publicly accessible website.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-19 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Hospital Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-19-88. Access to pain management services.
(a) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
prescription coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state
on or after January 1, 2027, shall develop a plan to provide adequate coverage of and access to a
broad spectrum of pain management services including, but not limited to, nonopioid, nonnarcotic
medication for pain management and nonmedication pain management services that serve as
alternatives to the prescribing of opioid or narcotic drugs in accordance with guidelines developed
by the bureau.
(b) Approval by health insurance commissioner. Every individual or group health
insurance carrier shall file a plan required under subsection (a) of this section with the
commissioner for approval. In its review, the commissioner shall consider the adequacy of access
to a broad spectrum of pain management services under the plan and whether any policies adopted
by the carrier may create unduly preferential coverage of and access to prescribed opioids for pain
management without consideration of other pain management services.
(c) Information for enrollees. Every individual or group health insurance carrier shall
distribute educational materials to network providers about a pain management access plan under
subsection (a) and post information about the pain management access plan on the carrier's publicly
accessible website.
SECTION 3. Chapter 27-20 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Medical Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20-84. Access to pain management services.
(a) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
prescription coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state
on or after January 1, 2027, shall develop a plan to provide adequate coverage of and access to a
broad spectrum of pain management services including, but not limited to, nonopioid, nonnarcotic
medication for pain management and nonmedication pain management services that serve as
alternatives to the prescribing of opioid or narcotic drugs in accordance with guidelines developed
by the bureau.
(b) Approval by health insurance commissioner. Every individual or group health
insurance carrier shall file a plan required under subsection (a) of this section with the
LC004442 - Page 2 of 4

commissioner for approval. In its review, the commissioner shall consider the adequacy of access
to a broad spectrum of pain management services under the plan and whether any policies adopted
by the carrier may create unduly preferential coverage of and access to prescribed opioids for pain
management without consideration of other pain management services.
(c) Information for enrollees. Every individual or group health insurance carrier shall
distribute educational materials to network providers about a pain management access plan under
subsection (a) and post information about the pain management access plan on the carrier's publicly
accessible website.
SECTION 4. Chapter 27-41 of the General Laws entitled "Health Maintenance
Organizations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-41-101. Access to pain management services.
(a) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
prescription coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state
on or after January 1, 2027, shall develop a plan to provide adequate coverage of, and access to, a
broad spectrum of pain management services including, but not limited to, nonopioid, nonnarcotic
medication for pain management and nonmedication pain management services that serve as
alternatives to the prescribing of opioid or narcotic drugs in accordance with guidelines developed
by the bureau.
(b) Approval by health insurance commissioner. Every individual or group health
insurance carrier shall file a plan required under subsection (a) of this section with the
commissioner for approval. In its review, the commissioner shall consider the adequacy of access
to a broad spectrum of pain management services under the plan and whether any policies adopted
by the carrier may create unduly preferential coverage of and access to prescribed opioids for pain
management without consideration of other pain management services.
(c) Information for enrollees. Every individual or group health insurance carrier shall
distribute educational materials to network providers about a pain management access plan under
subsection (a) and post information about the pain management access plan on the carrier's publicly
accessible website.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004442
========
LC004442 - Page 3 of 4